Hawaii, session 2025, SB783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346-    Coverage of ambulance services.  Beginning on January 1, 2026, the State's medicaid program shall provide coverage for: (1)  Ambulance services; and (2)  Community paramedicine services rendered statewide by emergency medical technicians or paramedics." SECTION 2.  Section 346-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Ambulance services" means any medical care rendered as part of the business or regular activity of using an ambulance to respond to and treat sick, injured, or otherwise medically or psychologically incapacitated individuals, whether or not transportation of the individual receiving the medical care is ultimately required." SECTION 3.  Chapter 431, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to article 10A to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§431:10A-    Coverage of ambulance and emergency medical services.  (a) Each individual or group policy of accident and health or sickness insurance issued or renewed in this State on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for: (1)  Ambulance services; and (2)  Community paramedicine services rendered statewide by emergency medical technicians or paramedics. (b)  For the purposes of this section, "ambulance services" has the same meaning as defined in section 346-1." SECTION 4.  Chapter 432, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VI of article I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§432:1-    Coverage of ambulance and emergency medical services.  (a) Each individual and group hospital or medical service plan contract issued or renewed in this State on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for: (1)  Ambulance services; and (2)  Community paramedicine services rendered statewide by emergency medical technicians or paramedics. (b)  For the purposes of this section, "ambulance services" has the same meaning as defined in section 346-1." SECTION 5.  Section 432D-23, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§432D-23 Required provisions and benefits.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each policy, contract, plan, or agreement issued in the State after January 1, 1995, by health maintenance organizations pursuant to this chapter, shall include benefits provided in sections 431:10-212, 431:10A-115, 431:10A-115.5, 431:10A-116, 431:10A-116.2, 431:10A-116.5, 431:10A-116.6, 431:10A-119, 431:10A-120, 431:10A-121, 431:10A-122, 431:10A-125, 431:10A-126, 431:10A-132, 431:10A-133, 431:10A-134, 431:10A-140, [and 431:10A-134,] and 431:10A-  , and chapter 431M." SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to comply with collectively bargained for requirements and personnel costs arising from the coverage of ambulances services required or authorized under section 1 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025; provided that section 1 shall take effect upon approval of the Hawaii medicaid state plan by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid services. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________